Massachusetts, session 194th, H2220.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 177 of the acts of 2022 is hereby amended by striking out Section
84 and inserting in
place thereof the following section:-
Section 84. For the purposes of section 22A of chapter 32A of the General Laws, section
10P of chapter 118E of the General Laws, section 47QQ of chapter 175 of the General Laws,
section 8RR of chapter 176A of the General Laws, section 4RR of chapter 176B of the General
Laws and section 4JJ of chapter 176G of the General Laws, reimbursement for the psychiatric
collaborative care model shall include, but not be limited to, the following current procedural
terminology billing codes: (i) 99492; (ii) 99493; (iii) 99494; and (iv) G2214.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 13L the following section:-
of 4

Section 13M. (a) For the purposes of this section, “psychiatric collaborative care model”
shall mean the evidence-based, integrated behavioral health service delivery method in which a
primary care team consisting of a primary care provider and a care manager provides structured
care management to a patient, and that works in collaboration with a psychiatric consultant that
provides regular consultations to the primary care team to review the clinical status and care of
patients and to make recommendations.
“Managed care entity”, all contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan, and accountable care
organizations.
“Minimum payment rates”, rates of payment for services below which managed care
entities may not enter into provider agreements.
(b) The division shall increase minimum payment rates for psychiatric collaborative care
model billing codes such that they are equal to or greater than the current Medicare Resource-
Based Relative Value Scale physician fee schedule for such codes and adjusted annually.
(c) Notwithstanding applicable state and federal laws, the division shall direct its
managed care entities to increase minimum payment rates for psychiatric collaborative care
model billing codes such that they are equal to or greater than the current Medicare Resource-
Based Relative Value Scale physician fee schedule for such codes and adjusted annually.
(d) Pursuant to sections 13C and 13D, and notwithstanding applicable state and federal
laws, the division shall ensure that psychiatric collaborative care model billing codes are
removed from the defined set of billing codes included in the division’s accountable care
of 4

organization primary care sub-capitation per-member per-month rate and that said codes shall be
paid on a fee-for-service basis.
SECTION 3. Section 22A of Chapter 32A of the General Law, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraphs:-
(c) The commission shall increase minimum payment rates for psychiatric collaborative
care model billing codes such that they are equal to or greater than the current Medicare
Resource-Based Relative Value Scale physician fee schedule for such codes and adjusted
annually.
SECTION 4. Section 47QQ of Chapter 175 of the General Law, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraph:-
(c) An individual policy of accident and sickness insurance issued pursuant to section 108
that provides hospital expense and surgical expense insurance or a group blanket or general
policy of accident and sickness insurance issued pursuant to section 110 that provides hospital
expense and surgical expense insurance that is issued or renewed within or without the
commonwealth shall increase minimum payment rates for psychiatric collaborative care model
billing codes such that they are equal to or greater than the current Medicare Resource-Based
Relative Value Scale physician fee schedule for such codes and adjusted annually.
SECTION 5. Section 8RR of Chapter 176A of the General Law, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraph: -
(c) A contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
hospital service plan which is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall
of 4

increase minimum payment rates for psychiatric collaborative care model billing codes such that
they are equal to or greater than the current Medicare Resource-Based Relative Value Scale
physician fee schedule for such codes and adjusted annually.
SECTION 6. Section 4RR of Chapter 176B of the General Law, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraph:-
(c) A subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement that
is issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall increase minimum payment rates for
psychiatric collaborative care model billing codes such that they are equal to or greater than the
current Medicare Resource-Based Relative Value Scale physician fee schedule for such codes
and adjusted annually.
SECTION 7. Section 4JJ of Chapter 176G of the General Law, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraph:-
(c) Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed within
the commonwealth shall increase minimum payment rates for psychiatric collaborative care
model billing codes such that they are equal to or greater than the current Medicare Resource-
Based Relative Value Scale physician fee schedule for such codes and adjusted annually.
of 4